Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6104
Authority to convert.

A domestic mutual insurer may amend its articles of incorporation pursuant to the Insurers Demutualization Act to become a stock insurer under a fair and equitable plan of conversion approved by the director.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 44.